Illinois, session 104th, HB5582.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing Section 7-20 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 705/7-20)7    Sec. 7-20. Fee waivers. 8    (a) For Social Equity Applicants, the Department of 9Financial and Professional Regulation and the Department of 10Agriculture shall waive 50% of any nonrefundable license 11application fees, any nonrefundable fees associated with 12purchasing a license to operate a cannabis business 13establishment, and any surety bond or other financial 14requirements, provided a Social Equity Applicant meets the 15following qualifications at the time the payment is due:16        (1) the applicant, including all individuals and 17    entities with 10% or greater ownership and all parent 18    companies, subsidiaries, and affiliates, has less than a 19    total of $750,000 of income in the previous calendar year; 20    and 21        (2) the applicant, including all individuals and 22    entities with 10% or greater ownership and all parent 23    companies, subsidiaries, and affiliates, has no more than   HB5582- 2 -LRB104 18243 BDA 31682 b1    2 other licenses for cannabis business establishments in 2    the State of Illinois. 3    (a-5) For Social Equity Applicants, the Department of 4Financial and Professional Regulation and the Department of 5Agriculture shall waive 50% of any nonrefundable license 6application fees, any nonrefundable fees associated with 7purchasing a license to operate a cannabis business 8establishment, and any surety bond or other financial 9requirements, if the Social Equity Applicant meets the 10following qualifications at the time the payment is due:11        (1) the applicant promises to open and operate the 12    business in a Disproportionately Impacted Area; and13        (2) the applicant promises to hire and employ at least 14    40% of all employees and contracted labor from persons 15    residing in or headquartered in the Disproportionately 16    Impacted Area where the business will be located.17    A breach of a promise by an applicant under this 18subsection shall constitute a violation of this Act.19    (b) The Department of Financial and Professional 20Regulation and the Department of Agriculture may require 21Social Equity Applicants to attest that they meet the 22requirements for a fee waiver as provided in subsection (a) or 23(a-5) and to provide evidence of annual total income in the 24previous calendar year or any other evidence or covenant 25required. Fee waivers or other requirement waivers under 26subsections (a) and (a-5) may not be cumulative, and an   HB5582- 3 -LRB104 18243 BDA 31682 b1applicant who qualifies both under subsections (a) and (a-5) 2may only choose one. 3    (c) If the Department of Financial and Professional 4Regulation or the Department of Agriculture determines that an 5applicant who applied as a Social Equity Applicant is not 6eligible for such status, the applicant shall be provided an 7additional 10 days to provide alternative evidence that he or 8she qualifies as a Social Equity Applicant. Alternatively, the 9applicant may pay the remainder of the waived fee and be 10considered as a non-Social Equity Applicant. If the applicant 11cannot do either, then the Departments may keep the initial 12application fee and the application shall not be graded.13(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.)